Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2403
Necessity of appointment for administration.

Except as otherwise provided in article 25, to acquire the powers and undertake the duties and liabilities of a personal representative of a decedent, a person must be appointed by order of the court or registrar, qualify and be issued letters. Administration of an estate is commenced by the issuance of letters.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 81, UPC § 3-103.

Under the Nebraska Probate Code, the right and duty to sue and recover assets for an estate reside in the estate's appointed personal representative, not the devisees. In re Estate of Hedke, 278 Neb. 727, 775 N.W.2d 13 (2009).